North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-23 Agricultural Conservation and Adjustment Law [Repealed]

4-23-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 2, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 4-2301; S.L. 1993, ch. 54, § 106; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-23-02.
Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act — Acceptance — Limitation of powers under. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 2, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 4-2302; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-23-03.
North Dakota state university extension service designated as state agency. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 2, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 4-2303; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-23-04.
State agency to formulate agricultural plans — Investigations — Submission to federal government. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 2, § 5, subss. a, b, g; R.C. 1943, § 4-2304; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-23-05.
Contents of agricultural plans. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 2, § 5, subss. c, d, e, f; R.C. 1943, § 4-2305; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-23-06.
State agency to receive and disburse all funds available under this chapter. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 2, § 6, subs. a, b; R.C. 1943, § 4-2306; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-23-07.
State agency to keep accounts — Accounts to be credited. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 2, § 6, subs. c; R.C. 1943, § 4-2307; 2005, ch. 261, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-23-08.
State agency to utilize available services. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 2, § 7, subs. a; R.C. 1943, § 4-2308; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-23-09.
Agencies and officers of state authorized to assist state agency. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 2, § 7, subs. d; R.C. 1943, § 4-2309; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-23-10.
State agency may make rules and secure equipment and assistance. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 2, § 7, subss. b, c; R.C. 1943, § 4-2310; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-23-11.
State agency to designate agricultural districts and communities. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 2, § 8, subss. a, b, c; R.C. 1943, § 4-2311; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-23-12.
Community and county committees. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 2, § 9; R.C. 1943, § 4-2312; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-23-13.
State committee — Members — Duties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 2, § 10; R.C. 1943, § 4-2313; S.L. 1967, ch. 74, § 10; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-23-14.
Reports by and to state agency — Enforcement of agricultural plan. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 2, § 11; R.C. 1943, § 4-2314; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.